Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. In General

§ 41-7-101.
Waiver of defect of service.

In case of failure to serve any notice of any proceeding or hearing in this chapter [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

] provided for upon any person or corporation, such persons or corporation may appear in open court and waive such defect of service, or may waive it by filing in court or delivering to the commissioners of the irrigation district to be filed in court a written waiver of such defect, in which waiver said defect shall be described, which waiver shall be signed by such party and witnessed and acknowledged before a proper officer having power to take acknowledgments of deeds.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 54; C.S. 1920, § 988; R.S. 1931, § 22-739; C.S. 1945, § 71-839; W.S. 1957, § 41-269.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter,” referred to in this section, means Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, which appears as §§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

.

Original irrigation district legislation and its subsequent history. —

See Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Discrimination between property within and that outside of governmental districts as to rates, 4 ALR2d 595.

§ 41-7-102.
Construction; generally.

The provisions of this chapter [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

] shall be liberally construed to promote the public welfare by reclaiming and irrigating lands, constructing and completing reservoirs, canals, ditches, or other works specified in the petition and the preservation or operation of any irrigation system heretofore or hereafter constructed according to law.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 56; C.S. 1920, § 990; Laws 1923, ch. 91, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-741; C.S. 1945, § 71-841; W.S. 1957, § 41-270.

Taking is for public use regardless of number of benefited lands. —

The taking of land for an irrigation ditch in the western states is generally regarded as for a public use, regardless of the number of acres or distinct tracts or farms to be irrigated or the number of independent owners, such taking being held permissible for the purpose of irrigating land owned by a single individual. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 41-7-103.
Construction; formerly organized districts; pending liens, actions.

Nothing in this act [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-401

,

41-7-403

through

41-7-412

,

41-7-414

,

41-7-415

] shall be construed as to affect the validity of any district heretofore organized under the laws of this state, or its rights in or to property, or any of its rights or privileges of whatsoever kind or nature; but said districts are hereby made subject to the provisions of this act so far as practicable; nor shall it affect, impair, or discharge any contract, obligations, lien, or charge for, or upon which it was or might become liable or chargeable had not this act been passed; nor shall it affect the validity of any bonds which have been issued; nor shall it affect any action which now may be pending.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 67; C.S. 1920, § 995; R.S. 1931, § 122-746; C.S. 1945, § 71-846; W.S. 1957, § 41-271.

§ 41-7-104.
Construction; existing water rights.

Nothing in this act [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-401

,

41-7-403

through

41-7-412

,

41-7-414

,

41-7-415

] shall be so construed as to in any manner impair existing water rights, appropriations or priorities within said district.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 68; C.S. 1920, § 996; R.S. 1931, § 122-747; C.S. 1945, § 71-847; W.S. 1957, § 41-272.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 69, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.